Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2076
Listing of common diagnostic related groups; when required.

(1) Effective January 1, 1986, each hospital, except hospitals excluded under section 1886(d)(1)(B) of Public Law 98-21, the Social Security Act Amendments of 1983, and ambulatory surgical center shall identify the twenty most common diagnostic related groups for which services are provided by the hospital or center. Such listing of diagnostic related groups shall be made available to consumers of health care, along with the range of average charges for treatment and the associated average length of stay for each diagnostic related group listed. Such listing shall be provided to any person upon request. The information included in the listing shall show the date prepared and shall be regularly updated every six months.

(2) Any hospital or ambulatory surgical center which provides services for fewer than twenty diagnostic related groups or performs an insufficient number of procedures to compute a statistically valid average shall provide a listing to the public of the most common diagnostic related groups provided by the hospital or center and the average charges and length of stay for which a valid statistical average is available and shall disclose the circumstances for such limited available data.

Laws 1985, LB 382, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 121.